Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1540
Director, defined.

Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 52;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 114;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 407.
September 30, 2030